Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-409
County service committee; offices; tax; levy.

The county board of each county in this state shall provide, by special levy or out of the general fund of the county, such amount as is necessary for the use of the county service committee to aid and enable such county service committee to carry out and execute its functions, powers, and duties as defined in sections 80-401 to 80-401.11, 80-403, 80-404, 80-404.04, and 80-406 to 80-410 and to pay its expenses. The county board shall provide offices for the county veterans service officer in a location determined by the board.

Laws 1947, c. 306, § 17, p. 934;

Laws 2001, LB 10, § 2.